Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB337.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 383.300 and 383.302, and notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, if law enforcement or fire protection services are
dispatched to a property more than three (3) times in any six (6) month period
and the presence of law enforcement or fire services is directly attributable to the
tenant's conduct, then the landlord may terminate the rental agreement with the
tenant upon three (3) days' notice.
(2) If the rental agreement is terminated under this section, the landlord shall return
all the unused portion of any prepaid rent. Accounting for rent in the event of a
termination shall be made as of the date the rental agreement is terminated.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 383.505 TO 383.715 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 383.300 and 383.302, and notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, if law enforcement or fire protection services are
dispatched to a property more than three (3) times in any six (6) month period
and the presence of law enforcement or fire services is directly attributable to the
tenant's conduct, then the landlord may terminate the rental agreement with the
tenant upon three (3) days' notice.
(2) If the rental agreement is terminated under this section, the landlord shall return
all the unused portion of any prepaid rent. Accounting for rent in the event of a
termination shall be made as of the date the rental agreement is terminated.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:26 AM Jacketed